District of Columbia statutes.
47-2212

Certificate of registration.

The provisions of § 47-2026 are hereby incorporated in and made applicable to this chapter; provided, that vendors and persons who have been issued certificates of registration under Chapter 20 of this title shall not be required to have such certificates under this chapter.

History

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 128, ch. 146, title II, § 222
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2212.
1973 Ed., § 47-2712.